California statutes. Penal Code
 all or any part of the state penalty, the payment of which would work a hardship on the person convicted or his or her immediate family.

(e) After a determination by the court of the amount due, the clerk of the court shall collect the penalty and transmit it to the county treasury. The portion thereof attributable to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code shall be deposited in the appropriate county fund and 70 percent of the balance shall then be transmitted to the State Treasury, to be deposited in the State Penalty Fund, which is hereby created, and 30 percent to remain on deposit in the county general fund. The transmission to the State Treasury shall be carried out in the same manner as fines collected for the state by a county.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance shall provide a schedule to the Controller for all
 transfers of funds made available by the Budget Act from the State Penalty Fund in the current fiscal year.

(g) Upon the order of the Department of Finance, sufficient funds may be transferred by the Controller from the General Fund for cashflow needs of the State Penalty Fund. A cashflow loan made pursuant to this provision shall be short term and does not constitute a General Fund expenditure. A cashflow loan and the repayment of a cashflow loan does not affect the General Fund reserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 34.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1464.05.

Wherever the word “assessment” appears in any reference to Section 1464 in any law or regulation with regard to a fine, penalty, or bail forfeiture, it shall be deemed to refer to the penalty, state penalty, or additional penalty required by Section 1464.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1293, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1464.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when an allocation and distribution of any fine, forfeiture, penalty, fee, or assessment collected in any criminal case is made, including, but not limited to, moneys collected pursuant to this chapter, Section 13003 of the Fish and Game Code, Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code, and Sections 11372.5 and 11502 of the Health and Safety Code, the allocation and distribution of any payment may be based upon the law in effect during the accounting period when the payment is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 37.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.5.

An assessment of two dollars ($2) for every ten dollars ($10) or fraction thereof, for every fine, forfeiture, or parking penalty imposed and collected pursuant to Section 42001.13 of the Vehicle Code for violation of Section 22507.8 of the Vehicle Code, may be imposed by each county upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors. An assessment imposed by this section shall be collected and disbursed as provided in Section 9545 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.6.

(a) In addition to an assessment levied pursuant to Section 1465.5 of this code, or any other law, an additional assessment equal to 10 percent of the fine imposed under Section 42001.5, 42001.13, or 42002 of the Vehicle Code shall be imposed by each county for a criminal violation of the following:

(1) Subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of
 Section 4461 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) Subdivision (c) of Section 4463 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) Section 22507.8 of the Vehicle Code.

(4) Section 22522 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) An assessment imposed pursuant to this section shall be deposited with the city or county where the violation occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.7.

(a) A state surcharge of 20 percent shall be levied on the base fine used to calculate the state penalty assessment as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1464.

(b) This surcharge shall be in addition to the state penalty assessed pursuant to Section 1464 of the Penal Code and may not be included in the base fine used to calculate the state penalty assessment as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1464.

(c) After a determination by the court of the amount due, the clerk of the court shall cause the amount of the state surcharge collected to be transmitted to the General Fund.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code and subdivision (b) of Section 68090.8 of the Government Code, the full amount of the surcharge shall be transmitted to the State Treasury to be deposited in the General Fund. Of the amount collected from the total amount of the fines, penalties, and surcharges imposed, the amount of the surcharge established by this section shall be transmitted to the State Treasury to be deposited in the General Fund.

(e) When any deposited bail is made for an offense to which this section applies, and for which a court appearance is not mandatory, the person making the deposit shall also deposit a sufficient
 amount to include the surcharge prescribed by this section.

(f) When amounts owed by an offender as a result of a conviction are paid in installment payments, payments shall be credited pursuant to Section 1203.1d. The amount of the surcharge established by this section shall be transmitted to the State Treasury prior to the county retaining or disbursing the remaining amount of the fines, penalties, and forfeitures imposed.

(g) Notwithstanding Sections 40512.6 and 42007 of the Vehicle Code, the term “total bail” as used in subdivision (a) of Section 42007 of the Vehicle Code does not include the surcharge set forth in this section. The surcharge set forth in this section shall be levied on what would have been the base fine had the provisions of Section 42007 not been invoked and the proceeds from the imposition of the surcharge shall be treated as otherwise set forth in this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 63.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.8.

(a) (1) To assist in funding court operations, an assessment of forty dollars ($40) shall be imposed on every conviction for a criminal offense, including a traffic offense, except parking offenses as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 1463, involving a violation of a section of the Vehicle Code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to the Vehicle Code.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “conviction” includes the dismissal of a traffic violation on the condition that the defendant attend a court-ordered traffic violator school, as authorized by Sections 41501 and 42005 of the Vehicle Code. This court operations assessment shall be deposited in accordance with subdivision (d), and may not be
 included with the fee calculated and distributed pursuant to Section 42007 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) This assessment shall be in addition to the state penalty assessed pursuant to Section 1464 and may not be included in the base fine to calculate the state penalty assessment as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1464. The penalties authorized by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code, and the state surcharge authorized by Section 1465.7, do not apply to this assessment.

(c) When bail is deposited for an offense to which this section applies, and for which a court appearance is not necessary, the person making the deposit shall also deposit a sufficient amount to include the assessment prescribed by this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessments collected
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall all be deposited in a special account in the county treasury and transmitted therefrom monthly to the Controller for deposit in the Trial Court Trust Fund. The assessments collected pursuant to this section shall not be subject to subdivision (e) of Section 1203.1d, but shall be disbursed under subdivision (b) of Section 1203.1d.

(e) The Judicial Council shall provide for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 40, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 67.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.9.

(a) The balance of any court-imposed costs pursuant to Section 987.4, subdivision (a) of Section 987.5, Sections 987.8, 1203, 1203.1e, 1203.016, 1203.018, 1203.1b, 1208.2, 1210.15, 1463.07, 3010.8, 4024.2, and 6266, as those sections read on June 30, 2021, shall be unenforceable and uncollectible and any portion of a judgment imposing those costs shall be vacated.

(b) On and after January 1, 2022, the balance of any court-imposed costs pursuant to Section 1001.15, 1001.16, 1001.90, 1202.4, 1203.1, 1203.1ab, 1203.1c, 1203.1m, 1203.4a, 1203.9, 1205, 1214.5, 2085.5, 2085.6, or 2085.7, as those sections read on December 31, 2021, shall be unenforceable and uncollectible and any portion of a
 judgment imposing those costs shall be vacated.

(c) On and after July 1, 2022, the balance of any court-imposed civil assessments pursuant to Section 1214.1 imposed prior to that date shall be unenforceable and uncollectible and any portion of a judgment imposing those assessments shall be vacated.

(d) Upon the expiration of 10 years after the date of imposition of a restitution fine pursuant to Section 1202.4, the balance, including any collection fees, shall be unenforceable and uncollectible and any portion of a judgment imposing those fines shall be vacated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Appeals In Misdemeanor and Infraction Cases [1466. - 1469.]

1466.

An appeal may be taken from a judgment or order, in an infraction or misdemeanor case, to the appellate division of the superior court of the county in which the court from which the appeal is taken is located, in the following cases:

(a) By the people:

(1) From an order recusing the district attorney or city attorney pursuant to Section 1424.

(2) From an order or judgment dismissing or otherwise terminating all or any portion of the action, including such an order or judgment, entered after a verdict or finding of guilty or a verdict or judgment entered before the defendant has
 been placed in jeopardy or where the defendant has waived jeopardy.

(3) From sustaining a demurrer to any portion of the complaint or pleading.

(4) From an order granting a new trial.

(5) From an order arresting judgment.

(6) From any order made after judgment affecting the substantial rights of the people.

(7) From the imposition of an unlawful sentence, whether or not the court suspends the execution of sentence. As used in this paragraph, “unlawful sentence” means the imposition of a sentence not authorized by law or the imposition of a sentence based upon an unlawful order of the court that strikes or otherwise modifies the effect of an enhancement or prior conviction. A defendant
 shall have the right to counsel in the people’s appeal of an unlawful sentence under the same circumstances that he or she would have a right to counsel under subdivision (a) of Section 1238.

(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an appeal from an order granting probation. Instead, the people may seek appellate review of any grant of probation, whether or not the court imposes sentence, by means of a petition for a writ of mandate or prohibition that is filed within 60 days after probation is granted. The review of any grant of probation shall include review of any order underlying the grant of probation.

(b) By the defendant:

(1) From a final judgment of conviction. A sentence, an order granting probation, a conviction in a case in which before final judgment the defendant is committed for
 insanity or is given an indeterminate commitment as a mentally disordered sex offender, or the conviction of a defendant committed for controlled substance addiction shall be deemed to be a final judgment within the meaning of this section. Upon appeal from a final judgment or an order granting probation the court may review any order denying a motion for a new trial.

(2) From any order made after judgment affecting his or her substantial rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 304, Sec. 11.   (SB 428)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1467.

An appeal from a judgment of conviction does not stay the execution of the judgment in any case unless the trial or a reviewing court shall so order. The granting or refusal of such an order shall rest in the discretion of the court, except that a court shall not stay any duty to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 960, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1468.

Appeals to the appellate divisions of superior courts shall be taken, heard and determined, the decisions thereon shall be remitted to the courts from which the appeals are taken, and the records on such appeals shall be made up and filed in such time and manner as shall be prescribed in rules adopted by the Judicial Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 425.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1469.

Upon appeal by the people the reviewing court may review any question of law involved in any ruling affecting the judgment or order appealed from, without exception having been taken in the trial court. Upon an appeal by a defendant the court may, without exception having been taken in the trial court, review any question of law involved in any ruling, order, instruction, or thing whatsoever said or done at the trial or prior to or after judgment, which thing was said or done after objection made in and considered by the trial court and which affected the substantial rights of the defendant. The court may also review any instruction given, refused or modified, even though no objection was made thereto in the trial court if the substantial rights of the defendant were affected thereby. The reviewing court may reverse, affirm or modify the judgment or order appealed from, and may set aside, affirm or modify any or all of the proceedings subsequent to, or dependent upon, such judgment or order, and may, if proper, order a new trial. If a new trial is ordered upon appeal, it must be had in the court from which the appeal is taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1257.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Transfer of Misdemeanor and Infraction Appeals [1471. - 1471.]

1471.

A court of appeal may order any case on appeal to a superior court in its district transferred to it for hearing and decision as provided by rules of the Judicial Council when the superior court certifies, or the court of appeal determines, that such transfer appears necessary to secure uniformity of decision or to settle important questions of law.

A court to which any such case is transferred shall have similar power to review any matter and make orders and judgments as the appellate division of the superior court by statute would have in such case, except as otherwise expressly provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 427.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 12. OF SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS OF A CRIMINAL NATURE [1473. - 1564.]



  CHAPTER 1. Of the Writ of Habeas Corpus [1473. - 1509.1.]

1473.

(a) A person unlawfully imprisoned or restrained of their liberty, under any pretense, may prosecute a writ of habeas corpus to inquire into the cause of the imprisonment or restraint.

(b) (1) A writ of habeas corpus may be prosecuted for, but not limited to, the following reasons:

(A) False evidence that is material on the issue of guilt or punishment was introduced against a person at a hearing or trial relating to the person’s incarceration.

(B) False physical evidence, believed by a person to be factual, probative, or material on the issue of guilt, which was known by the person at the time of entering a plea
 of guilty, which was a material factor directly related to the plea of guilty by the person.

(C) (i) New evidence exists that is presented without substantial delay, is admissible, and is sufficiently material and credible that it more likely than not would have changed the outcome of the case.

(ii) For purposes of this section, “new evidence” means evidence that has not previously been presented and heard at trial and has been discovered after trial.

(D) A significant dispute has emerged or further developed in the petitioner’s favor regarding expert medical, scientific, or forensic testimony that was introduced at trial or a hearing and that expert testimony more likely than not affected the outcome of the case.

(i) For purposes
 of this section, the expert medical, scientific, or forensic testimony includes the expert’s conclusion or the scientific, forensic, or medical facts upon which their opinion is based.

(ii) For purposes of this section, the significant dispute may be as to the reliability or validity of the diagnosis, technique, methods, theories, research, or studies upon which a medical, scientific, or forensic expert based their testimony.

(iii) Under this section, a significant dispute can be established by credible expert testimony or declaration, or by peer reviewed literature showing that experts in the relevant medical, scientific, or forensic community, substantial in number or expertise, have concluded that developments have occurred that undermine the reliability or validity of the diagnosis, technique, methods, theories, research, or studies upon which a medical, scientific, or
 forensic expert based their testimony.

(iv) In assessing whether a dispute is significant, the court shall give great weight to evidence that a consensus has developed in the relevant medical, scientific, or forensic community undermining the reliability or validity of the diagnosis, technique, methods, theories, research, or studies upon which a medical, scientific, or forensic expert based their testimony or that there is a lack of consensus as to the reliability or validity of the diagnosis, technique, methods, theories, research, or studies upon which a medical, scientific, or forensic expert based their testimony.

(v) The significant dispute must have emerged or further developed within the relevant medical, scientific, or forensic community, which includes the scientific community and all fields of scientific knowledge on which those fields or disciplines rely and shall not
 be limited to practitioners or proponents of a particular scientific or technical field or discipline.

(vi) If the petitioner makes a prima facie showing that they are entitled to relief, the court shall issue an order to show cause why relief shall not be granted. To obtain relief, all the elements of this subparagraph must be established by a preponderance of the evidence.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “false evidence” includes opinions of experts that have either been repudiated by the expert who originally provided the opinion at a hearing or trial or that have been undermined by the state of scientific knowledge or later scientific research or technological advances.

(3) Any allegation that the prosecution knew or should have known of the false nature of the evidence is immaterial to the prosecution of a
 writ of habeas corpus brought under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1).

(4) This subdivision does not create additional liabilities, beyond those already recognized, for an expert who repudiates the original opinion provided at a hearing or trial or whose opinion has been undermined by scientific research, technological advancements, or because of a reasonable dispute within the expert’s relevant scientific community as to the validity of the methods, theories, research, or studies upon which the expert based their opinion.

(c) This section does not change the existing procedures for habeas relief, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(d) This section does not limit the grounds for which a writ of habeas corpus may be prosecuted or preclude the use of any other remedies.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a writ of habeas corpus may also be prosecuted after judgment has been entered based on evidence that a criminal conviction or sentence was sought, obtained, or imposed in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 745, if that section applies based on the date of judgment as provided in subdivision (j) of Section 745.

(1) Any and all definitions and legal thresholds specified in Section 745 are controlling for purposes of claims alleging a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 745 contained within a habeas petition filed under this section.

(2) A petitioner, or their counsel, may file a motion for relevant evidence under subdivision (d) of Section 745 upon the prosecution of a petition under this subdivision, or in preparation to file a petition.

(3) A petition raising a claim of this nature for the first time, or on the basis of new discovery provided by the state or other new evidence that could not have been previously known by the petitioner with due diligence, shall not be deemed a successive or abusive petition.

(4) If the petitioner has a habeas corpus petition pending in state court, but it has not yet been decided, the petitioner may amend the existing petition with a claim that the petitioner’s conviction or sentence was sought, obtained, or imposed in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 745.

(5) The petition shall state if the petitioner requests appointment of counsel and the court shall appoint counsel if the petitioner cannot afford counsel and either the petition pleads a plausible allegation of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 745 or the State Public Defender requests counsel be appointed. Newly appointed counsel may amend a petition filed before their appointment.

(6) If the defendant is represented by an attorney and the petition alleges a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 745, based in whole or in part on the conduct of one or more law enforcement officers, the attorney shall serve a copy of the motion on the law enforcement agency or agencies that employed the officer or officers.

(7) (A) The court shall review a petition raising a claim pursuant to Section 745 and shall determine if the petitioner has made a prima facie showing. A prima facie determination shall be based on the petitioner’s showing and the record. The court may request an informal response from the state.

(B) If the petitioner makes a prima facie showing, the court shall issue an order to
 show cause why relief shall not be granted and hold an evidentiary hearing, unless the state declines to show cause. The defendant may appear remotely, and the court may conduct the hearing through the use of remote technology, unless counsel indicates that the defendant’s presence in court is needed.

(C) If the court determines that the petitioner has not established a prima facie showing, the court shall state the factual and legal basis for its conclusion on the record or issue a written order detailing the factual and legal basis for its conclusion.

(8) If the court finds a violation of subdivision (a), the court shall impose one or more of the applicable remedies as outlined in subdivision (e) of Section 745.

(f) If the court holds an evidentiary hearing and the petitioner is incarcerated in state prison, the petitioner may choose not to appear
 for the hearing with a signed or oral waiver on record, or they may appear remotely through the use of remote technology, unless counsel indicates that the defendant’s presence in court is needed.

(g) For purposes of this section, if the district attorney in the county of conviction or the Attorney General concedes or stipulates to a factual or legal basis for habeas relief, there shall be a presumption in favor of granting relief. This presumption may be overcome only if the record before the court contradicts the concession or stipulation or it would lead to the court issuing an order contrary to law.

(h) (1) If after the court grants postconviction relief under this section and the prosecuting agency elects to retry the petitioner, the petitioner’s postconviction counsel may be appointed as counsel or cocounsel to represent the petitioner on the retrial if
 both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The petitioner and postconviction counsel both agree for postconviction counsel to be appointed.

(B) Postconviction counsel is qualified to handle trials.

(2) Counsel shall be paid under the applicable pay scale for appointed counsel. Otherwise, the court shall appoint other appropriate counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 784, Sec. 3.5.   (SB 734)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1473.1.

The Judicial Council shall promulgate standards for appointment of private counsel in superior court for claims filed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1473 by individuals who are not sentenced to death. These standards shall include a minimum requirement of 10 hours of training in the California Racial Justice Act of 2020. The training required by this section shall meet the requirements for Minimum Continuing Legal Education credit approved by the State Bar of California. Appointment standards for counsel where an individual has been sentenced to death shall be consistent with existing standards set forth in the California Rules of Court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 29.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1473.5.

(a) A writ of habeas corpus also may be prosecuted on the basis that competent and substantial expert testimony relating to intimate partner battering and its effects, within the meaning of Section 1107 of the Evidence Code, was not presented to the trier of fact at the trial court proceedings and is of such substance that, had the competent and substantial expert testimony been presented, there is a
 reasonable probability, sufficient to undermine confidence in the judgment of conviction or sentence, that the result of the proceedings would have been different. Sections 1260 to 1262, inclusive, apply to the prosecution of a writ of habeas corpus pursuant to this section. As used in this section, “trial court proceedings” means those court proceedings that occur from the time the accusatory pleading is filed until and including judgment and sentence.

(b) This section is limited to violent felonies as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 that were committed before August 29, 1996, and that resulted in judgments of conviction or sentence after a plea or trial as to which expert testimony admissible pursuant to Section 1107 of the Evidence Code may be probative on the issue of culpability.

(c) A showing that expert testimony relating to intimate partner battering and its
 effects was presented to the trier of fact is not a bar to granting a petition under this section if that expert testimony was not competent or substantial. The burden of proof is on the petitioner to establish a sufficient showing that competent and substantial expert testimony, of a nature which would be competent using prevailing understanding of intimate partner battering and its effects, was not presented to the trier of fact, and had that evidence been presented, there is a reasonable probability that the result of the proceedings would have been different.

(d) If a petitioner for habeas corpus under this section has previously filed a petition for writ of habeas corpus, it is grounds for denial of the new petition if a court determined on the merits in the prior petition that the omission of expert testimony relating to battered women’s syndrome or intimate partner battering and its effects at trial was not prejudicial and did not
 entitle the petitioner to the writ of habeas corpus.

(e) For purposes of this section, the changes that become effective on January 1, 2005, are not intended to expand the uses or applicability of expert testimony on battering and its effects that were in effect immediately prior to that date in criminal cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (AB 593)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1473.6.

(a) Any person no longer unlawfully imprisoned or restrained may prosecute a motion to vacate a judgment for any of the following reasons:

(1) Newly discovered evidence of fraud by a government official that completely undermines the prosecution’s case, is conclusive, and points unerringly to his or her innocence.

(2) Newly discovered evidence that a government official testified falsely at the trial that resulted
 in the conviction and that the testimony of the government official was substantially probative on the issue of guilt or punishment.

(3) Newly discovered evidence of misconduct by a government official committed in the underlying case that resulted in fabrication of evidence that was substantially material and probative on the issue of guilt or punishment. Evidence of misconduct in other cases is not sufficient to warrant relief under this paragraph.

(b) For purposes of this section, “newly discovered evidence” is evidence that could not have been discovered with reasonable diligence prior to judgment.

(c) The procedure for bringing and adjudicating a motion under this section, including the burden of producing evidence and the burden of proof, shall be the same as for prosecuting a writ of habeas corpus.

(d) A motion pursuant to this section must be filed within one year of the later of the following:

(1) The date the moving party discovered, or could have discovered with the exercise of due diligence, additional evidence of the misconduct or fraud by a government official beyond the moving party’s personal knowledge.

(2) The effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1105, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1473.7.

(a) A person who is no longer in criminal custody may file a motion to vacate a conviction or sentence for any of the following reasons:

(1) The conviction or sentence is legally invalid due to prejudicial error damaging the moving party’s ability to meaningfully understand, defend against, or knowingly accept the actual or potential adverse immigration consequences of a conviction or sentence. A finding of legal invalidity may, but need not, include a finding of ineffective assistance of counsel.

(2) Newly discovered evidence of actual innocence exists that requires vacation of the conviction or sentence as a matter of law or in the interests of justice.

(3) (A) A conviction or sentence was sought, obtained, or imposed on the basis of race, ethnicity, or national origin in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 745.

(B) If the motion alleges a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 745, based in whole or in part on the conduct of one or more law enforcement officers, the person shall serve a copy of the motion on the law enforcement agency or agencies that employed the officer or officers.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a motion pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed timely filed at any time in which the individual filing the motion is no longer in criminal custody.

(2) A motion pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may be deemed untimely filed if it was not filed with reasonable diligence after the later of the following:

(A) The moving party receives a notice to appear in immigration court or other notice from immigration authorities that asserts the conviction or sentence as a basis for removal or the denial of an application for an immigration benefit, lawful status, or naturalization.

(B) Notice that a final removal order has been issued against the moving party, based on the existence of the conviction or sentence that
 the moving party seeks to vacate.

(c) A motion pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) shall be filed without undue delay from the date the moving party discovered, or could have discovered with the exercise of due diligence, the evidence that provides a basis for relief under this section or Section 745.

(d) All motions shall be entitled to a hearing. Upon the request of the moving party, the court may hold the hearing without the personal presence of the moving party provided that it finds good cause as to why the moving party cannot be present. If the prosecution has no objection to the motion, the court may grant the motion to vacate the conviction or sentence without a hearing.

(e) In preparation for the filing of a
 motion pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the defendant may file a motion to obtain discovery as outlined in subdivision (d) of Section 745.

(f) When ruling on the motion:

(1) The court shall grant the motion to vacate the conviction or sentence if the moving party establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, the existence of any of the grounds for relief specified in subdivision (a). For a motion made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the moving party shall also establish that the conviction or sentence being challenged is currently causing or has the
 potential to cause removal or the denial of an application for an immigration benefit, lawful status, or naturalization.

(2) There is a presumption of legal invalidity for the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if the moving party pleaded guilty or nolo contendere pursuant to a statute that provided that, upon completion of specific requirements, the arrest and conviction shall be deemed never to have occurred, where the moving party complied with these requirements, and where the disposition under the statute has been, or potentially could be, used as a basis for adverse immigration consequences.

(3) If the court grants the motion to vacate a conviction or sentence obtained through a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, the court shall allow the moving party to withdraw the plea.

(4) When ruling on a motion
 under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the only finding that the court is required to make is whether the conviction is legally invalid due to prejudicial error damaging the moving party’s ability to meaningfully understand, defend against, or knowingly accept the actual or potential adverse immigration consequences of a conviction or sentence. When ruling on a motion under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the court shall specify the basis for its conclusion.

(5) If the court grants a motion made pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the court shall impose one or more of the applicable remedies as outlined in subdivision (e) of Section 745.

(g) An order granting or denying the motion is appealable under subdivision (b) of Section 1237 as an order after judgment affecting the substantial rights of a party.

(h) A court may only issue a specific finding of ineffective assistance of counsel as a result of a motion brought under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if the attorney found to be ineffective was given timely advance notice of the motion hearing by the moving party or the prosecutor, pursuant to Section 416.90 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 784, Sec. 4.5.   (SB 734)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1474.

Application for the writ is made by petition, signed either by the party for whose relief it is intended, or by some person in his behalf, and must specify:

1. That the person in whose behalf the writ is applied for is imprisoned or restrained of his liberty, the officer or person by whom he is so confined or restrained, and the place where, naming all the parties, if they are known, or describing them, if they are not known;

2. If the imprisonment is alleged to be illegal, the petition must also state in what the alleged illegality consists;

3. The petition must be verified by the oath or affirmation of the party making the application.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1475.

The writ of habeas corpus may be granted in the manner provided by law. If the writ has been granted by any court or a judge thereof and after the hearing thereof the prisoner has been remanded, he or she shall not be discharged from custody by the same or any other court of like general jurisdiction, or by a judge of the same or any other court of like general jurisdiction, unless upon some ground not existing in fact at the issuing of the prior writ. Should the prisoner desire to urge some point of law not raised in the petition for or at the hearing upon the
 return of the prior writ, then, in case the prior writ had been returned or returnable before a superior court or a judge thereof, no writ can be issued upon a second or other application except by the appropriate court of appeal or some judge thereof, or by the Supreme Court or some judge thereof, and in the event the writ must not be made returnable before any superior court or any judge thereof. In the event, however, that the prior writ was returned or made returnable before a court of appeal or any judge thereof, no writ can be issued upon a second or other application except by the Supreme Court or some judge thereof, and the writ must be made returnable before said Supreme Court or some judge thereof.

Every application for a writ of habeas corpus must be verified, and shall state whether any prior application or applications have been made for a writ in regard to the same detention or restraint complained of in the application, and if any prior application or
 applications have been made the later application must contain a brief statement of all proceedings had therein, or in any of them, to and including the final order or orders made therein, or in any of them, on appeal or otherwise.

Whenever the person applying for a writ of habeas corpus is held in custody or restraint by any officer of any court of this state or any political subdivision thereof, or by any peace officer of this state, or any political subdivision thereof, a copy of the application for the writ must in all cases be served upon the district attorney of the county wherein the person is held in custody or restraint at least 24 hours before the time at which said writ is made returnable and no application for the writ can be heard without proof of service in cases where the service is required.

If the person is in custody for violation of an ordinance of a city which has a city attorney, a copy of the